West Virginia, session 2026, HB5329.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 20. FEES AND EXPENDITURES FOR COUNTY DEVELOPMENT. §7-20-8a. Establishment of operational sinking fund. (a) Establishment of fund. – A portion of impact fees collected under this article may be placed into an operational sinking fund, to allow for the funding of various operations related to expanding public services due to growth.(b) Collection of existing funds. – Funds already collected may be used in the same manner.  (c) Limit of funds. – Operational funds shall not be more than 25% of the total impact fee assessed. (d) Where fund is allowed. – Operational impact fees are allowed for all county operations except for schools.(e) Effective date. -This section shall be effective from passage.